Utah statutes.
10-6-118.   Adoption of final budget -- Certification and filing.

Before the last June 22 of each fiscal period, or, in the case of a property tax increase under Sections 59-2-919 through 59-2-923, before August 17 of the year for which a property tax increase is proposed, the governing body shall by resolution or ordinance adopt a budget for the ensuing fiscal period for each fund for which a budget is required under this chapter.  A copy of the final budget for each fund shall be certified by the budget officer and filed with the state auditor within 30 days after adoption.

